New York, session 2025-2026, S5038.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 187 of the correction law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 5 to read as follows: 3 5. a. Any incarcerated individual over sixty-two years of age who has 4 served at least five years of such individual's sentence shall have the 5 option to stop participating in programs and work assignments under this 6 article and shall receive a monthly retirement stipend of thirty 7 dollars. 8 b. The commissioner shall inform each incarcerated individual who is 9 eligible for retirement under paragraph a of this subdivision of such 10 individual's option to retire. 11 c. If an eligible individual decides to continue working and refuses 12 the retirement stipend, the commissioner shall so note in writing. 13 d. Any incarcerated individual who has refused the retirement benefit 14 under paragraph c of this subdivision may elect to stop working and 15 receive such benefit upon thirty days written notice to the commission- 16 er. 17 e. Nothing in this subdivision shall excuse an individual from 18 completing any program required for parole release, provided, however, 19 that an eligible individual who is waiting for an opening in such a 20 program may stop working until such program becomes available. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect one year after it shall have become a 22 law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or repeal of any 23 rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on its 24 effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before such 25 date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00021-01-5